Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7144.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9-9-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-9 entitled "Jury Lists" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
9-9-3. Persons exempt from service.
The following persons shall be exempted from serving as jurors, unless such persons shall
waive their exemption, namely: the members of congress from the state of Rhode Island, the general
officers of the state, the members and officers of the general assembly during their tenure of office
irrespective of whether the general assembly is in session or not, the jury commissioner and his or
her assistants, the justices of the state and United States courts, clerks of those courts, practicing
attorneys-at-law, correctional officers, deputy sheriffs, probation and parole officers, members of
any paid police force of the state or of any city or town, members of any paid fire department of
any city or town, and members of the armed services on active duty, and those persons seventy (70)
years of age or older.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003579
========